District of Columbia statutes.
31-3104

Mental illness benefits.

(a)

Covered benefits for services set forth in this section shall be limited to coverage of treatment of clinically significant mental illnesses identified in the most recent edition of the International Classification of Diseases or of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of the American Psychiatric Association.

(b)

Treatment under this section shall be covered pursuant to § 31-3102 for a minimum of 60 days per year for inpatient or residential care in a hospital or nonhospital residential facility, and at a minimum rate of 75% for the first 40 outpatient visits per year and at a minimum rate of 60% for any outpatient visits thereafter for that year.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-195, § 5, 34 DCR 491
Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-242, § 2(d), 54 DCR 601
D.C. Law 16-242, in subsec. (b), substituted “60 days” for “45 days”.
1981 Ed., § 35-2304.
This section is referenced in § 31-3102, § 31-3105, § 31-3106, and § 31-3110.